Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2315
Corporation; documents; filing without payment of fees or taxes.

The articles of incorporation, any deeds or other documents conveying properties to the corporation, any mortgages or deeds of trust executed by the corporation, any leases made by the corporation, and the certificate of dissolution of the corporation may all be filed for record without the payment of any tax or fees other than fees as authorized by law for the recording of the instruments.

Laws 1972, LB 1517, § 16;

Laws 1995, LB 494, § 15.